Nebraska, session 109, LB895.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB895 LB895
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 88-527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
88-527 (1) No person shall act as a warehouse operator without a
license issued pursuant to the Grain Warehouse Act. Warehouses, including
except warehouses that which are licensed under the United States
Warehouse Act, shall be licensed and regulated by the commission. The
commission shall establish a streamlined process for applicants that hold
a valid license under the United States Warehouse Act to apply for a
license under the Grain Warehouse Act. Such streamlined process shall
provide for reduced application and oversight requirements as determined
by the commission. If the applicant is an individual, the application
shall include the applicant's social security number. Such warehouses
shall be inspected by the commission at least once every twelve months.
(2) If the commission determines that additional examinations are
necessary after a regular examination is completed at a warehouse, the
commission may charge such warehouse for the cost of the additional
examinations according to the commission's fee schedule. Warehouses shall
only be charged if such examinations are for reasons of irregularities
from the previous examination or if financial conditions warrant
additional examinations.
(3) The commission may make available to the United States
Government or any of its agencies, including the Commodity Credit
Corporation, the results of inspections made and inspection reports
submitted by employees of the commission upon payment of such fees as may
be determined by the commission. The fees shall cover the actual cost of
the services rendered in regard to providing the information.
(4) The commission may charge for inspections conducted at the
request of a warehouse licensee.
(5) The commission may assess a surveillance fee against the assets
of a warehouse licensee for actual expenses incurred by the commission in
suspending a license or terminating the operations of a warehouse
-2-

LB895 LB895
2026 2026
licensee. The commission may enter into contracts for such purpose and
shall keep a record of all surveillance fees collected. All surveillance
fees collected by the commission shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Nebraska Grain Warehouse Surveillance Cash Fund.
(6) The commission may enter into agreements and contracts with
regulators in states which border Nebraska for the purpose of licensing
or examining any public grain warehouse operator which operates
facilities in such states. The commission shall assume all jurisdiction
over any warehouse operator headquartered in Nebraska regarding his or
her warehouse activity. A warehouse operator headquartered and licensed
in another state which acquires facilities in Nebraska is under the
jurisdiction of the headquarter state under the terms of such agreement
or contract.
Sec. 2. Section 88-529, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
88-529 The commission shall charge an annual license fee for each
warehouse to be operated, except as provided in section 88-531. The fee
for any license issued for less than twelve months shall be prorated
based on its duration. The annual license fee shall be established by the
commission but shall not exceed the fees established for applicable
commodities in the 2025/2026 Rates Charged for AMS Services notice for
entities with a Commodity Credit Corporation agreement, as such notice
existed on January 1, 2026, that was published by the Agricultural
Marketing Service of the United States Department of Agriculture. Such
fees are due on or before the date established by the commission for each
license. as provided in this section.
Capacity in Bushels Fee
0 — 10,000 $ 45
10,001 — 25,000 57
25,001 — 50,000 68
50,001 — 75,000 78
-3-

LB895 LB895
2026 2026
75,001 — 100,000 90
100,001 — 150,000 102
150,001 — 200,000 113
200,001 — 250,000 125
250,001 — 300,000 135
300,001 — 350,000 147
350,001 — 400,000 156
400,001 — 450,000 170
450,001 — 500,000 180
500,001 — 600,000 192
600,001 — 700,000 203
700,001 — 800,000 215
800,001 — 900,000 225
900,001 — 1,000,000 237
1,000,001 — 2,000,000 338
2,000,001 — 3,000,000 395
3,000,001 — 4,000,000 450
4,000,001 — 5,000,000 507
5,000,001 — 6,000,000 563
6,000,001 — 7,000,000 620
7,000,001 — 8,000,000 675
8,000,001 — 9,000,000 732
9,000,001 — 10,000,000 788
10,000,001 — 11,000,000 845
11,000,001 — 15,000,000 1,070
15,000,001 — 20,000,000 1,350
20,000,001 — 25,000,000 1,632
25,000,001 — 30,000,000 1,913
30,000,001 — 40,000,000 2,475
40,000,001 or more 3,375
-4-

LB895 LB895
2026 2026
Sec. 3. Section 88-548, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
88-548 (1) Any grain dealer, person, firm, corporation, or
association in this state licensed under the United States Warehouse Act
shall be exempt from the Grain Warehouse Act, except that each licensee
under the United States Warehouse Act shall (a) annually notify the
commission in writing of such license and shall notify the commission at
once in writing if the license is terminated, canceled, or suspended and
(b) post notification of such licensee's bond under the United States
Warehouse Act in a conspicuous place of business listing the total amount
of bond on the stored grain.
(2) No warehouse licensee, licensee under the United States
Warehouse Act, or grain dealer licensed pursuant to section 75-903 shall
use end-intake air probes which use a vacuum to collect a sample from a
load of grain to determine foreign material content. The commission shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding approval of grain
probes. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a
Class I misdemeanor.
Sec. 4. Original sections 88-527, 88-529, and 88-548, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-